test/src/morphology/sje-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verbs - ballat: # -a-stammar
    ballat+V+Inf: ballat
    
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: balav
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bala
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ballá
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ballin
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [ballabehtin, ballabähtten]
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ballaba
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ballap
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ballabihtit
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ballabihtit
    ballat+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: billi

    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: billiv
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: billi
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: balaj
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: balajmen
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: balajden
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: balajga
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: balajme
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: balajde
    ballat+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: billin

    ballat+V+Pot+Sg1: balatjav
    ballat+V+Pot+Sg2: balatja
    ballat+V+Pot+Sg3: balatj
    ballat+V+Pot+Du1: balatjin
    ballat+V+Pot+Du2: [balatjiehpen, balatjähppen]
    ballat+V+Pot+Du3: balatjiebá
    ballat+V+Pot+Pl1: balatjip
    ballat+V+Pot+Pl2: balatjihpit
    ballat+V+Pot+Pl3: balatji
    
    
